engine/dictionaries/sr/sr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1032 Y 13
SFX 1032 њ њи
SFX 1032 њ њег
SFX 1032 њ њега
SFX 1032 њ њем
SFX 1032 њ њему
SFX 1032 њ њим
SFX 1032 њ њих
SFX 1032 њ њима
SFX 1032 њ ње
SFX 1032 њ ња
SFX 1032 њ њој
SFX 1032 њ њу
SFX 1032 њ њом

SFX 1033 Y 13
SFX 1033 к кши
SFX 1033 к кшег
SFX 1033 к кшега
SFX 1033 к кшем
SFX 1033 к кшему
SFX 1033 к кшим
SFX 1033 к кших
SFX 1033 к кшима
SFX 1033 к кше
SFX 1033 к кша
SFX 1033 к кшој
SFX 1033 к кшу
SFX 1033 к кшом

SFX 1034 Y 13
SFX 1034 ви вљи
SFX 1034 ви вљег
SFX 1034 ви вљега
SFX 1034 ви вљем
SFX 1034 ви вљему
SFX 1034 ви вљим
SFX 1034 ви вљих
SFX 1034 ви вљима
SFX 1034 ви вље
SFX 1034 ви вља
SFX 1034 ви вљој
SFX 1034 ви вљу
SFX 1034 ви вљом

SFX 1035 Y 13
SFX 1035 н њи
SFX 1035 н њег
SFX 1035 н њега
SFX 1035 н њем
SFX 1035 н њему
SFX 1035 н њим
SFX 1035 н њих
SFX 1035 н њима
SFX 1035 н ње
SFX 1035 н ња
SFX 1035 н њој
SFX 1035 н њу
SFX 1035 н њом

SFX 1036 Y 13
SFX 1036 п пши
SFX 1036 п пшег
SFX 1036 п пшега
SFX 1036 п пшем
SFX 1036 п пшему
SFX 1036 п пшим
SFX 1036 п пших
SFX 1036 п пшима
SFX 1036 п пше
SFX 1036 п пша
SFX 1036 п пшој
SFX 1036 п пшу
SFX 1036 п пшом

SFX 1037 Y 13
SFX 1037 ш шији
SFX 1037 ш шијег
SFX 1037 ш шијега
SFX 1037 ш шијем
SFX 1037 ш шијему
SFX 1037 ш шијим
SFX 1037 ш шијих
SFX 1037 ш шијима
SFX 1037 ш шије
SFX 1037 ш шија
SFX 1037 ш шијој
SFX 1037 ш шију
SFX 1037 ш шијом

SFX 1038 Y 13
SFX 1038 ли њи
SFX 1038 ли њег
SFX 1038 ли њега
SFX 1038 ли њем
SFX 1038 ли њему
SFX 1038 ли њим
SFX 1038 ли њих
SFX 1038 ли њима
SFX 1038 ли ње
SFX 1038 ли ња
SFX 1038 ли њој
SFX 1038 ли њу
SFX 1038 ли њом

SFX 1039 Y 13
SFX 1039 р рији
SFX 1039 р ријег
SFX 1039 р ријега
SFX 1039 р ријем
SFX 1039 р ријему
SFX 1039 р ријим
SFX 1039 р ријих
SFX 1039 р ријима
SFX 1039 р рије
SFX 1039 р рија
SFX 1039 р ријој
SFX 1039 р рију
SFX 1039 р ријом

SFX 1040 Y 13
SFX 1040 ав вији
SFX 1040 ав вијег
SFX 1040 ав вијега
SFX 1040 ав вијем
SFX 1040 ав вијему
SFX 1040 ав вијим
SFX 1040 ав вијих
SFX 1040 ав вијима
SFX 1040 ав вије
SFX 1040 ав вија
SFX 1040 ав вијој
SFX 1040 ав вију
SFX 1040 ав вијом

SFX 1041 Y 13
SFX 1041 ао лији
SFX 1041 ао лијег
SFX 1041 ао лијега
SFX 1041 ао лијем
SFX 1041 ао лијему
SFX 1041 ао лијим
SFX 1041 ао лијих
SFX 1041 ао лијима
SFX 1041 ао лије
SFX 1041 ао лија
SFX 1041 ао лијој
SFX 1041 ао лију
SFX 1041 ао лијом

SFX 1042 Y 13
SFX 1042 п пији
SFX 1042 п пијег
SFX 1042 п пијега
SFX 1042 п пијем
SFX 1042 п пијему
SFX 1042 п пијим
SFX 1042 п пијих
SFX 1042 п пијима
SFX 1042 п пије
SFX 1042 п пија
SFX 1042 п пијој
SFX 1042 п пију
SFX 1042 п пијом

SFX 1043 Y 13
SFX 1043 л лији
SFX 1043 л лијег
SFX 1043 л лијега
SFX 1043 л лијем
SFX 1043 л лијему
SFX 1043 л лијим
SFX 1043 л лијих
SFX 1043 л лијима
SFX 1043 л лије
SFX 1043 л лија
SFX 1043 л лијој
SFX 1043 л лију
SFX 1043 л лијом

SFX 1044 Y 26
SFX 1044 в вљи
SFX 1044 в вљег
SFX 1044 в вљега
SFX 1044 в вљем
SFX 1044 в вљему
SFX 1044 в вљим
SFX 1044 в вљих
SFX 1044 в вљима
SFX 1044 в вље
SFX 1044 в вља
SFX 1044 в вљој
SFX 1044 в вљу
SFX 1044 в вљом
SFX 1044 в вији
SFX 1044 в вијег
SFX 1044 в вијега
SFX 1044 в вијем
SFX 1044 в вијему
SFX 1044 в вијим
SFX 1044 в вијих
SFX 1044 в вијима
SFX 1044 в вије
SFX 1044 в вија
SFX 1044 в вијој
SFX 1044 в вију
SFX 1044 в вијом

SFX 1045 Y 13
SFX 1045 х хији
SFX 1045 х хијег
SFX 1045 х хијега
SFX 1045 х хијем
SFX 1045 х хијему
SFX 1045 х хијим
SFX 1045 х хијих
SFX 1045 х хијима
SFX 1045 х хије
SFX 1045 х хија
SFX 1045 х хијој
SFX 1045 х хију
SFX 1045 х хијом

SFX 1046 Y 13
SFX 1046 х ши
SFX 1046 х шег
SFX 1046 х шега
SFX 1046 х шем
SFX 1046 х шему
SFX 1046 х шим
SFX 1046 х ших
SFX 1046 х шима
SFX 1046 х ше
SFX 1046 х ша
SFX 1046 х шој
SFX 1046 х шу
SFX 1046 х шом

SFX 1047 Y 26
SFX 1047 д ђи
SFX 1047 д ђег
SFX 1047 д ђега
SFX 1047 д ђем
SFX 1047 д ђему
SFX 1047 д ђим
SFX 1047 д ђих
SFX 1047 д ђима
SFX 1047 д ђе
SFX 1047 д ђа
SFX 1047 д ђој
SFX 1047 д ђу
SFX 1047 д ђом
SFX 1047 д дији
SFX 1047 д дијег
SFX 1047 д дијега
SFX 1047 д дијем
SFX 1047 д дијему
SFX 1047 д дијим
SFX 1047 д дијих
SFX 1047 д дијима
SFX 1047 д дије
SFX 1047 д дија
SFX 1047 д дијој
SFX 1047 д дију
SFX 1047 д дијом

SFX 1048 Y 13
SFX 1048 ђ ђи
SFX 1048 ђ ђег
SFX 1048 ђ ђега
SFX 1048 ђ ђем
SFX 1048 ђ ђему
SFX 1048 ђ ђим
SFX 1048 ђ ђих
SFX 1048 ђ ђима
SFX 1048 ђ ђе
SFX 1048 ђ ђа
SFX 1048 ђ ђој
SFX 1048 ђ ђу
SFX 1048 ђ ђом

SFX 1049 Y 13
SFX 1049 ж жији
SFX 1049 ж жијег
SFX 1049 ж жијега
SFX 1049 ж жијем
SFX 1049 ж жијему
SFX 1049 ж жијим
SFX 1049 ж жијих
SFX 1049 ж жијима
SFX 1049 ж жије
SFX 1049 ж жија
SFX 1049 ж жијој
SFX 1049 ж жију
SFX 1049 ж жијом

SFX 1050 Y 13
SFX 1050 б бији
SFX 1050 б бијег
SFX 1050 б бијега
SFX 1050 б бијем
SFX 1050 б бијему
SFX 1050 б бијим
SFX 1050 б бијих
SFX 1050 б бијима
SFX 1050 б бије
SFX 1050 б бија
SFX 1050 б бијој
SFX 1050 б бију
SFX 1050 б бијом

SFX 1051 Y 26
SFX 1051 н нији
SFX 1051 н нијег
SFX 1051 н нијега
SFX 1051 н нијем
SFX 1051 н нијему
SFX 1051 н нијим
SFX 1051 н нијих
SFX 1051 н нијима
SFX 1051 н није
SFX 1051 н нија
SFX 1051 н нијој
SFX 1051 н нију
SFX 1051 н нијом
SFX 1051 н њи
SFX 1051 н њег
SFX 1051 н њега
SFX 1051 н њем
SFX 1051 н њему
SFX 1051 н њим
SFX 1051 н њих
SFX 1051 н њима
SFX 1051 н ње
SFX 1051 н ња
SFX 1051 н њој
SFX 1051 н њу
SFX 1051 н њом

SFX 1052 Y 13
SFX 1052 ђ ђији
SFX 1052 ђ ђијег
SFX 1052 ђ ђијега
SFX 1052 ђ ђијем
SFX 1052 ђ ђијему
SFX 1052 ђ ђијим
SFX 1052 ђ ђијих
SFX 1052 ђ ђијима
SFX 1052 ђ ђије
SFX 1052 ђ ђија
SFX 1052 ђ ђијој
SFX 1052 ђ ђију
SFX 1052 ђ ђијом

SFX 1053 Y 13
SFX 1053 нко њи
SFX 1053 нко њег
SFX 1053 нко њега
SFX 1053 нко њем
SFX 1053 нко њему
SFX 1053 нко њим
SFX 1053 нко њих
SFX 1053 нко њима
SFX 1053 нко ње
SFX 1053 нко ња
SFX 1053 нко њој
SFX 1053 нко њу
SFX 1053 нко њом

SFX 1054 Y 13
SFX 1054 шки жи
SFX 1054 шки жег
SFX 1054 шки жега
SFX 1054 шки жем
SFX 1054 шки жему
SFX 1054 шки жим
SFX 1054 шки жих
SFX 1054 шки жима
SFX 1054 шки же
SFX 1054 шки жа
SFX 1054 шки жој
SFX 1054 шки жу
SFX 1054 шки жом

SFX 1055 Y 13
SFX 1055 рок ри
SFX 1055 рок рег
SFX 1055 рок рега
SFX 1055 рок рем
SFX 1055 рок рему
SFX 1055 рок рим
SFX 1055 рок рих
SFX 1055 рок рима
SFX 1055 рок ре
SFX 1055 рок ра
SFX 1055 рок рој
SFX 1055 рок ру
SFX 1055 рок ром

SFX 1056 Y 13
SFX 1056 аљ љи
SFX 1056 аљ љег
SFX 1056 аљ љега
SFX 1056 аљ љем
SFX 1056 аљ љему
SFX 1056 аљ љим
SFX 1056 аљ љих
SFX 1056 аљ љима
SFX 1056 аљ ље
SFX 1056 аљ ља
SFX 1056 аљ љој
SFX 1056 аљ љу
SFX 1056 аљ љом

SFX 1057 Y 13
SFX 1057 н нски
SFX 1057 н нског
SFX 1057 н нскога
SFX 1057 н нском
SFX 1057 н нскоме
SFX 1057 н нским
SFX 1057 н нских
SFX 1057 н нскима
SFX 1057 н нске
SFX 1057 н нска
SFX 1057 н нској
SFX 1057 н нску
SFX 1057 н нско

SFX 1058 Y 13
SFX 1058 цо чки
SFX 1058 цо чког
SFX 1058 цо чкога
SFX 1058 цо чком
SFX 1058 цо чкоме
SFX 1058 цо чким
SFX 1058 цо чких
SFX 1058 цо чкима
SFX 1058 цо чке
SFX 1058 цо чка
SFX 1058 цо чкој
SFX 1058 цо чку
SFX 1058 цо чко

SFX 1059 Y 13
SFX 1059 а ански
SFX 1059 а анског
SFX 1059 а анскога
SFX 1059 а анском
SFX 1059 а анскоме
SFX 1059 а анским
SFX 1059 а анских
SFX 1059 а анскима
SFX 1059 а анске
SFX 1059 а анска
SFX 1059 а анској
SFX 1059 а анску
SFX 1059 а анско

SFX 1060 Y 13
SFX 1060 а ски
SFX 1060 а ског
SFX 1060 а скога
SFX 1060 а ском
SFX 1060 а скоме
SFX 1060 а ским
SFX 1060 а ских
SFX 1060 а скима
SFX 1060 а ске
SFX 1060 а ска
SFX 1060 а ској
SFX 1060 а ску
SFX 1060 а ско

SFX 1061 Y 13
SFX 1061 р рски
SFX 1061 р рског
SFX 1061 р рскога
SFX 1061 р рском
SFX 1061 р рскоме
SFX 1061 р рским
SFX 1061 р рских
SFX 1061 р рскима
SFX 1061 р рске
SFX 1061 р рска
SFX 1061 р рској
SFX 1061 р рску
SFX 1061 р рско

SFX 1062 Y 13
SFX 1062 ц чки
SFX 1062 ц чког
SFX 1062 ц чкога
SFX 1062 ц чком
SFX 1062 ц чкоме
SFX 1062 ц чким
SFX 1062 ц чких
SFX 1062 ц чкима
SFX 1062 ц чке
SFX 1062 ц чка
SFX 1062 ц чкој
SFX 1062 ц чку
SFX 1062 ц чко

SFX 1063 Y 13
SFX 1063 с шки
SFX 1063 с шког
SFX 1063 с шкога
SFX 1063 с шком
SFX 1063 с шкоме
SFX 1063 с шким
SFX 1063 с шких
SFX 1063 с шкима
SFX 1063 с шке
SFX 1063 с шка
SFX 1063 с шкој
SFX 1063 с шку
SFX 1063 с шко

SFX 1064 Y 13
SFX 1064 ци ачки
SFX 1064 ци ачког
SFX 1064 ци ачкога
SFX 1064 ци ачком
SFX 1064 ци ачкоме
SFX 1064 ци ачким
SFX 1064 ци ачких
SFX 1064 ци ачкима
SFX 1064 ци ачке
SFX 1064 ци ачка
SFX 1064 ци ачкој
SFX 1064 ци ачку
SFX 1064 ци ачко

SFX 1065 Y 13
SFX 1065 ћи ћки
SFX 1065 ћи ћког
SFX 1065 ћи ћкога
SFX 1065 ћи ћком
SFX 1065 ћи ћкоме
SFX 1065 ћи ћким
SFX 1065 ћи ћких
SFX 1065 ћи ћкима
SFX 1065 ћи ћке
SFX 1065 ћи ћка
SFX 1065 ћи ћкој
SFX 1065 ћи ћку
SFX 1065 ћи ћко

SFX 1066 Y 13
SFX 1066 е ски
SFX 1066 е ског
SFX 1066 е скога
SFX 1066 е ском
SFX 1066 е скоме
SFX 1066 е ским
SFX 1066 е ских
SFX 1066 е скима
SFX 1066 е ске
SFX 1066 е ска
SFX 1066 е ској
SFX 1066 е ску
SFX 1066 е ско

SFX 1067 Y 13
SFX 1067 д дски
SFX 1067 д дског
SFX 1067 д дскога
SFX 1067 д дском
SFX 1067 д дскоме
SFX 1067 д дским
SFX 1067 д дских
SFX 1067 д дскима
SFX 1067 д дске
SFX 1067 д дска
SFX 1067 д дској
SFX 1067 д дску
SFX 1067 д дско

SFX 1068 Y 13
SFX 1068 и ски
SFX 1068 и ског
SFX 1068 и скога
SFX 1068 и ском
SFX 1068 и скоме
SFX 1068 и ским
SFX 1068 и ских
SFX 1068 и скима
SFX 1068 и ске
SFX 1068 и ска
SFX 1068 и ској
SFX 1068 и ску
SFX 1068 и ско

SFX 1069 Y 13
SFX 1069 ца чки
SFX 1069 ца чког
SFX 1069 ца чкога
SFX 1069 ца чком
SFX 1069 ца чкоме
SFX 1069 ца чким
SFX 1069 ца чких
SFX 1069 ца чкима
SFX 1069 ца чке
SFX 1069 ца чка
SFX 1069 ца чкој
SFX 1069 ца чку
SFX 1069 ца чко

SFX 1070 Y 26
SFX 1070 а ски
SFX 1070 а ског
SFX 1070 а скога
SFX 1070 а ском
SFX 1070 а скоме
SFX 1070 а ским
SFX 1070 а ских
SFX 1070 а скима
SFX 1070 а ске
SFX 1070 а ска
SFX 1070 а ској
SFX 1070 а ску
SFX 1070 а ско
SFX 1070 а атски
SFX 1070 а атског
SFX 1070 а атскога
SFX 1070 а атском
SFX 1070 а атскоме
SFX 1070 а атским
SFX 1070 а атских
SFX 1070 а атскима
SFX 1070 а атске
SFX 1070 а атска
SFX 1070 а атској
SFX 1070 а атску
SFX 1070 а атско

SFX 1071 Y 13
SFX 1071 в вски
SFX 1071 в вског
SFX 1071 в вскога
SFX 1071 в вском
SFX 1071 в вскоме
SFX 1071 в вским
SFX 1071 в вских
SFX 1071 в вскима
SFX 1071 в вске
SFX 1071 в вска
SFX 1071 в вској
SFX 1071 в вску
SFX 1071 в вско

SFX 1072 Y 13
SFX 1072 о оански
SFX 1072 о оанског
SFX 1072 о оанскога
SFX 1072 о оанском
SFX 1072 о оанскоме
SFX 1072 о оанским
SFX 1072 о оанских
SFX 1072 о оанскима
SFX 1072 о оанске
SFX 1072 о оанска
SFX 1072 о оанској
SFX 1072 о оанску
SFX 1072 о оанско

SFX 1073 Y 13
SFX 1073 о ански
SFX 1073 о анског
SFX 1073 о анскога
SFX 1073 о анском
SFX 1073 о анскоме
SFX 1073 о анским
SFX 1073 о анских
SFX 1073 о анскима
SFX 1073 о анске
SFX 1073 о анска
SFX 1073 о анској
SFX 1073 о анску
SFX 1073 о анско

SFX 1074 Y 13
SFX 1074 це ачки
SFX 1074 це ачког
SFX 1074 це ачкога
SFX 1074 це ачком
SFX 1074 це ачкоме
SFX 1074 це ачким
SFX 1074 це ачких
SFX 1074 це ачкима
SFX 1074 це ачке
SFX 1074 це ачка
SFX 1074 це ачкој
SFX 1074 це ачку
SFX 1074 це ачко

SFX 1075 Y 13
SFX 1075 ија ски
SFX 1075 ија ског
SFX 1075 ија скога
SFX 1075 ија ском
SFX 1075 ија скоме
SFX 1075 ија ским
SFX 1075 ија ских
SFX 1075 ија скима
SFX 1075 ија ске
SFX 1075 ија ска
SFX 1075 ија ској
SFX 1075 ија ску
SFX 1075 ија ско

SFX 1076 Y 13
SFX 1076 и ијски
SFX 1076 и ијског
SFX 1076 и ијскога
SFX 1076 и ијском
SFX 1076 и ијскоме
SFX 1076 и ијским
SFX 1076 и ијских
SFX 1076 и ијскима
SFX 1076 и ијске
SFX 1076 и ијска
SFX 1076 и ијској
SFX 1076 и ијску
SFX 1076 и ијско

SFX 1077 Y 13
SFX 1077 о ски
SFX 1077 о ског
SFX 1077 о скога
SFX 1077 о ском
SFX 1077 о скоме
SFX 1077 о ским
SFX 1077 о ских
SFX 1077 о скима
SFX 1077 о ске
SFX 1077 о ска
SFX 1077 о ској
SFX 1077 о ску
SFX 1077 о ско

SFX 1078 Y 13
SFX 1078 с ски
SFX 1078 с ског
SFX 1078 с скога
SFX 1078 с ском
SFX 1078 с скоме
SFX 1078 с ским
SFX 1078 с ских
SFX 1078 с скима
SFX 1078 с ске
SFX 1078 с ска
SFX 1078 с ској
SFX 1078 с ску
SFX 1078 с ско

SFX 1079 Y 13
SFX 1079 ће ћки
SFX 1079 ће ћког
SFX 1079 ће ћкога
SFX 1079 ће ћком
SFX 1079 ће ћкоме
SFX 1079 ће ћким
SFX 1079 ће ћких
SFX 1079 ће ћкима
SFX 1079 ће ћке
SFX 1079 ће ћка
SFX 1079 ће ћкој
SFX 1079 ће ћку
SFX 1079 ће ћко
